Utah statutes.
76-10-1234.   Rulemaking authority.
The Division of Consumer Protection shall make rules in accordance with Title
63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to establish acceptable
rating methods to be implemented by a content provider under Subsection
76-10-1233(1).
